Washington statutes.
RCW 43.24.040

Forms to be prescribed.

The director of licensing shall prescribe the various forms of applications, certificates, and licenses required by law.

[ 1979 c 158 s 97; 1965 c 8 s 43.24.040. Prior: 1921 c 7 s 97; RRS s 10855.]

NOTES:

Application forms—Licenses—Mention of race or religion prohibited—Penalty: RCW 43.01.100.

Director to prescribe forms for applications, certificates of title, registration certificates, etc.: RCW 46.01.160.